Nevada, session 83, SB497.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 422.27497 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422.27497 1. The Director shall [include] :
(a) Include in the State Plan for Medicaid a requirement that the
State pay the nonfederal share of expenditures incurred for services
provided by behavior analysts, assistant behavior analysts and
registered behavior technicians to recipients of Medicaid who are
less than 27 years of age.
[2. The Director shall:
(a) Biennially establish and include in the State Plan for
Medicaid rates of reimbursement which are provided on a fee-for-
service basis for services provided by behavior analysts, assistant
behavior analysts and registered behavior technicians that are
comparable to rates of reimbursement paid by Medicaid programs in
other states for the services of those providers.]
(b) Establish reasonable limits on the number of hours that a
behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst or registered behavior
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
technician is authorized to bill for services provided to a recipient of
Medicaid in a 24-hour period.
[3.] 2. The Division shall provide training to behavior analysts,
assistant behavior analysts and registered behavior technicians who
provide services to recipients of Medicaid concerning the limits
established pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection [2.
4.] 1.
3. On or before January 31 of each year, the Division shall:
(a) Compile a report concerning the provision of services to
recipients of Medicaid who have been diagnosed with an autism
spectrum disorder. The report must include:
(1) The number of recipients of Medicaid who were newly
diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder during the immediately
preceding year and the number of those recipients for whom
assistance with care management was provided;
(2) The number of recipients of Medicaid diagnosed with an
autism spectrum disorder for whom assistance with care
management was reimbursed through Medicaid during the
immediately preceding year;
(3) The number of recipients of Medicaid for whom the first
claim for reimbursement for the services of a registered behavior
technician was submitted during the immediately preceding year;
(4) The number of assessments or evaluations by a behavior
analyst that were reimbursed through Medicaid during the
immediately preceding year;
(5) The total number of claims for applied behavior analysis
services provided to recipients of Medicaid made during the
immediately preceding year;
(6) For the immediately preceding year, the average times
that elapsed between claims for each step of the process that a
recipient of Medicaid must undergo to receive treatment from a
registered behavior technician, beginning with initial diagnosis with
an autism spectrum disorder and including, without limitation,
comprehensive diagnosis with an autism spectrum disorder,
evaluation and treatment by a behavior analyst and treatment by a
registered behavior technician;
(7) The number of recipients of Medicaid receiving services
through Medicaid managed care who were, at the end of the
immediately preceding year, on a wait list for applied behavior
analysis services;
(8) An assessment of the adequacy of the network of each
health maintenance organization or managed care organization that
provides services to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Medicaid for applied behavior analysis services, as compared to the
applicable standard for network adequacy set forth in the contract
between the health maintenance organization or managed care
organization and the Division;
(9) The number of behavior analysts and registered behavior
technicians who are currently providing services to recipients of
Medicaid who receive services through each health maintenance
organization or managed care organization described in
subparagraph (8); and
(10) The number of behavior analysts and registered
behavior technicians who provide services to recipients of Medicaid
who do not receive services through managed care.
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature; and
(2) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services.
[5.] 4. As used in this section:
(a) “Applied behavior analysis services” means the services of a
behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst or registered behavior
technician.
(b) “Assistant behavior analyst” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 641D.020.
(c) “Behavior analyst” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 641D.030.
(d) “Registered behavior technician” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 641D.100.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)